Utah statutes.
13-1a-1.   Creation of division -- Responsibilities.

There is established within the Department of  Commerce the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code which is responsible for corporation and commercial code filings in this state.



Amended by Chapter 225, 1989 General Session

